Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
SUBPART 2
FORECLOSURE CONSULTANTS

6-1-1104. Foreclosure consulting contract.

A foreclosure consulting contract shall be in writing and provided to and retained by the home owner, without changes, alterations, or modifications, for review at least twenty-four hours before it is signed by the home owner.

A foreclosure consulting contract shall be printed in at least twelve-point type and shall include the name and address of the foreclosure consultant to which a notice of cancellation can be mailed and the date the home owner signed the contract.

A foreclosure consulting contract shall fully disclose the exact nature of the foreclosure consulting services to be provided and the total amount and terms of any compensation to be received by the foreclosure consultant or associate.

A foreclosure consulting contract shall be dated and personally signed, with each page being initialed, by each home owner and the foreclosure consultant and shall be acknowledged by a notary public in the presence of the home owner at the time the contract is signed by the home owner.

A foreclosure consulting contract shall contain the following notice, which shall be printed in at least fourteen-point bold-faced type, completed with the name of the foreclosure consultant, and located in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the home owner's signature:

A completed form in duplicate, captioned "Notice of Cancellation" shall accompany the foreclosure consulting contract. The notice of cancellation shall:

Be on a separate sheet of paper attached to the contract;

Be easily detachable; and

Contain the following statement, printed in at least fourteen-point type:

The foreclosure consultant shall provide to the home owner a signed, dated, and acknowledged copy of the foreclosure consulting contract and the attached notice of cancellation immediately upon execution of the contract.

The time during which the home owner may cancel the foreclosure consulting contract does not begin to run until the foreclosure consultant has complied with this section.

Notice Required by Colorado Law

_______ (Name) or (his/her/its) associate cannot ask you to sign or have you sign any document that transfers any interest in your home or property to (him/her/it) or (his/her/its) associate.
_______ (Name) or (his/her/its) associate cannot guarantee you that they will be able to refinance your home or arrange for you to keep your home.
You may, at any time, cancel this contract, without penalty of any kind.
If you want to cancel this contract, mail or deliver a signed and dated copy of this notice of cancellation, or any other written notice, indicating your intent to cancel to ________________ (name and address of foreclosure consultant) at ______________________ (address of foreclosure consultant, including facsimile and electronic mail address).
As part of any cancellation, you (the home owner) must repay any money actually spent on your behalf by _____________________ (name of foreclosure consultant) prior to receipt of this notice and as a result of this agreement, within sixty days, along with interest at the prime rate published by the federal reserve plus two percentage points, with the total interest rate not to exceed eight percent per year.
This is an important legal contract and could result in the loss of your home. Contact an attorney or a housing counselor approved by the federal department of housing and urban development before signing.

Notice of Cancellation

(Date of contract)
To: (name of foreclosure consultant)
(Address of foreclosure consultant, including facsimile and electronic mail)
I hereby cancel this contract.
__________________ (Date)
__________________ (Home owner's signature)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1334, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

(4) amended, (HB 10-1133), ch. 350, p. 1616, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.

6-1-1105. Right of cancellation.

In addition to any right of rescission available under state or federal law, the home owner has the right to cancel a foreclosure consulting contract at any time.

Cancellation occurs when the home owner gives written notice of cancellation of the foreclosure consulting contract to the foreclosure consultant at the address specified in the contract or through any facsimile or electronic mail address identified in the contract or other materials provided to the home owner by the foreclosure consultant.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is effective when deposited in the United States mail, properly addressed, with postage prepaid.

Notice of cancellation need not be in the form provided with the contract and is effective, however expressed, if it indicates the intention of the home owner to cancel the foreclosure consulting contract.

As part of the cancellation of a foreclosure consulting contract, the home owner shall repay, within sixty days after the date of cancellation, all funds paid or advanced in good faith prior to the receipt of notice of cancellation by the foreclosure consultant or associate under the terms of the foreclosure consulting contract, together with interest at the prime rate published by the federal reserve plus two percentage points, with the total interest rate not to exceed eight percent per year, from the date of expenditure until repaid by the home owner.

The right to cancel may not be conditioned on the repayment of any funds.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1336, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1106. Waiver of rights - void.

A provision in a foreclosure consulting contract is void as against public policy if the provision attempts or purports to:

Waive any of the rights specified in this subpart 2 or the right to a jury trial;

Consent to jurisdiction for litigation or choice of law in a state other than Colorado;

Consent to venue in a county other than the county in which the property is located; or

Impose any costs or fees greater than the actual costs and fees.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1337, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1107. Prohibited acts.

A foreclosure consultant may not:

Claim, demand, charge, collect, or receive any compensation until after the foreclosure consultant has fully performed each and every service the foreclosure consultant contracted to perform or represented that the foreclosure consultant would perform;

Claim, demand, charge, collect, or receive any interest or any other compensation for a loan that the foreclosure consultant makes to the home owner that exceeds the prime rate published by the federal reserve at the time of any loan plus two percentage points, with the total interest rate not to exceed eight percent per year;

Take a wage assignment, lien of any type on real or personal property, or other security to secure the payment of compensation;

Receive any consideration from a third party in connection with foreclosure consulting services provided to a home owner unless the consideration is first fully disclosed in writing to the home owner;

Acquire an interest, directly, indirectly, or through an associate, in the real or personal property of a home owner with whom the foreclosure consultant has contracted;

Obtain a power of attorney from a home owner for any purpose other than to inspect documents as provided by law; or

Induce or attempt to induce a home owner to enter into a foreclosure consulting contract that does not comply in all respects with this subpart 2.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1337, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1108. Criminal penalties.

A person who violates section 6-1-1107 is guilty of a misdemeanor, as defined in section 18-1.3-504, C.R.S., and shall be subject to imprisonment in county jail for up to one year, a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars, or both.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1338, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1109. Unconscionability.

A foreclosure consultant or associate may not facilitate or engage in any transaction that is unconscionable given the terms and circumstances of the transaction.

If a court, as a matter of law, finds a foreclosure consultant contract or any clause of such contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid an unconscionable result.

When it is claimed or appears to the court that a foreclosure consultant contract or any clause of such contract may be unconscionable, the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect, to aid the court in making the determination.

In order to support a finding of unconscionability, there must be evidence of some bad faith overreaching on the part of the foreclosure consultant or associate such as that which results from an unreasonable inequality of bargaining power or other circumstances in which there is an absence of meaningful choice for one of the parties, together with contract terms that are, under standard industry practices, unreasonably favorable to the foreclosure consultant or associate.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1338, § 1, effective May 30.

6-1-1110. Language.

A foreclosure consulting contract, and all notices of cancellation provided for therein, shall be written in English and shall be accompanied by a written translation from English into any other language principally spoken by the home owner, certified by the person making the translation as a true and correct translation of the English version. The translated version shall be presumed to have equal status and credibility as the English version.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1338, § 1, effective May 30.